District of Columbia statutes.
31-1101

Applicability of provisions.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply with respect to:

(1)

Any insurance company licensed to do business in the District;

(2)

Any banking institution, trust, loan, mortgage, safe deposit, or title company, building association, credit union, moneylenders, or common trust fund authorized to do business in the District;

(3)

The inclusion of a charge for insurance in connection with an installment sale of a motor vehicle make in accordance with Chapter 6 of Title 50; or

(4)

The financing of insurance premiums in the District in accordance with the provisions of §§ 28-3301 and 28-3302 relating to rates of interest.

Oct. 9, 1940, ch. 792, ch. III, § 51
Apr. 18, 1966, 80 Stat. 126, Pub. L. 89-403, § 1
1981 Ed., § 35-1551.
1973 Ed., § 35-1361.